Indiana, session 2026, SB18.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-23-17.2-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) The governing body of the school
corporation consists of five (5) members, elected as provided in this
chapter.
(b) Three (3) members shall be elected as follows:
(1) From districts established as provided in section 4.1 of this
chapter. At large by all the voters of the school corporation.
(2) At the general election held in the county in 2026, 2030, 2034,
2038, 2042, and every four (4) years thereafter.
(c) Two (2) members shall be elected as follows:
(1) At large by all the voters of the school corporation.
(2) At the general election held in the county in 2028, 2032, 2036,
2040, 2044, and every four (4) years thereafter.
(d) The term of office of a member of the governing body:
(1) is four (4) years; and
(2) begins January 1 after the election of members of the
2026 IN 18—LS 6110/DI 143


governing body.
(e) Upon assuming office and in conducting the business of the
governing body, a member shall represent the interests of the entire
school corporation.
SECTION 2. IC 20-23-17.2-4.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4.1. (a) As used in this section, "council district" refers
to a district of the city legislative body:
(1) established under IC 36-4-6-3; and
(2) as in effect on January 1, 2015.
(b) The districts from which a member of the governing body is
elected under section 3.1(b) of this chapter are as follows:
(1) School corporation district 1 consists of the territory formed
by council district 1 and council district 2.
(2) School corporation district 2 consists of the territory formed
by council district 3 and council district 4.
(3) School corporation district 3 consists of the territory formed
by council district 5 and council district 6.
SECTION 3. IC 20-23-17.2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following apply to an election of
members of the governing body of the school corporation under section
3.1(b) of this chapter:
(1) Each candidate must file a petition of nomination with the
circuit court clerk not earlier than one hundred four (104) days
and not later than seventy-four (74) days before the general
election at which members are to be elected. The petition of
nomination must include the following information:
(A) The name of the candidate.
(B) The candidate's residence address and the district in which
the candidate resides.
(C) The signatures of at least twenty (20) registered voters
residing within the school corporation district the candidate
seeks to represent.
(D) A certification that the candidate meets the qualifications
for candidacy imposed by this chapter.
(E) The school corporation district that the candidate seeks to
represent.
(2) Only eligible voters residing in the school corporation district
as provided in section 4.1 of this chapter may vote for a candidate
to represent that school corporation district.
(3) One (1) candidate shall be elected for each school corporation
district provided by section 4.1 of this chapter. The candidate
2026 IN 18—LS 6110/DI 143


elected for a school corporation district must reside within the
boundaries of the school corporation district. The candidate
elected as the member for a particular school corporation district
is the candidate who, among all the candidates who reside within
that school corporation district, receives the greatest number of
votes from voters residing in that school corporation district.
(b) (a) The following apply to an election of the members of the
governing body of the school corporation under section 3.1(c) 3.1 of
this chapter:
(1) Each candidate must file a petition of nomination with the
circuit court clerk not earlier than one hundred four (104) days
and not later than seventy-four (74) days before the general
election at which members are to be elected. The petition of
nomination must include the following information:
(A) The name of the candidate.
(B) The candidate's residence address.
(C) The signatures of at least one hundred (100) registered
voters residing within the school corporation.
(D) A certification that the candidate meets the qualifications
for candidacy imposed by this chapter.
(E) The fact that the candidate seeks to be elected from the
school corporation at large.
(2) Only eligible voters residing in the school corporation may
vote for a candidate.
(3) At an election held under section 3.1(c) of this chapter, two
(2) candidates shall be elected at large. The two (2) candidates
who receive the greatest number of votes among all candidates
running for an at-large seat are elected as members of the
governing body.
(4) At an election held under section 3.1(b) of this chapter,
three (3) candidates shall be elected at large. The three (3)
candidates who receive the greatest number of votes among
all candidates running for an at-large seat are elected as
members of the governing body.
(c) (b) The following apply to a petition of nomination required
under subsections subsection (a)(1): and (b)(1):
(1) The petition must:
(A) contain the information required under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5); and
(B) be accompanied by the certification described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(b), if required under IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(c).
(2) Unless a candidate that states a political party affiliation under
2026 IN 18—LS 6110/DI 143


IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(A) is challenged under IC 3-8-2.5-7, the
candidate's statement under IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5) must be
indicated on the ballot in the manner determined by the county
election board.
(3) IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(c) and IC 3-8-2.5-7(e) through IC 3-8-2.5-7(g)
apply to a candidate who files a petition of nomination.
SECTION 4. IC 20-23-17.2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.222-2015,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Voters who reside within the boundaries of
the school corporation may vote for the candidates elected under
section 3.1 of this chapter.
(b) At an election held under section 3.1(b) of this chapter, each
voter may vote only for three (3) at-large candidates. the following:
(1) One (1) candidate to represent the district in which the voter
resides.
(2) Two (2) at-large candidates.
(c) At an election held under section 3.1(c) of this chapter, each
voter may vote only for two (2) at-large candidates.
2026 IN 18—LS 6110/DI 143